Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
Article 6 Accord and Satisfaction

13-4-100.
Effect of executory accord.

An accord may not amount to an extinguishment of the original debt but may extend only to suspend the execution or collection thereof for a limited time; in the meantime, an action on the original debt cannot be sustained.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2820; Code 1868, § 2828; Code 1873, § 2879; Code 1882, § 2879; Civil Code 1895, § 3733; Civil Code 1910, § 4327; Code 1933, § 20-1202.

13-4-101.
Elements and requirements of accord and satisfaction generally.

Accord and satisfaction occurs where the parties to an agreement, by a subsequent agreement, have satisfied the former agreement, and the latter agreement has been executed. The execution of a new agreement may itself amount to a satisfaction of the former agreement, where it is so expressly agreed by the parties; and, without such agreement, if the new promise is founded on a new consideration, the taking of it is a satisfaction of the former agreement.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2819; Code 1868, § 2827; Code 1873, § 2878; Code 1882, § 2878; Civil Code 1895, § 3732; Civil Code 1910, § 4326; Code 1933, § 20-1201.

Parties need not intend particular solution. —

Although the parties must intend to reach an accord and satisfaction, the parties need not agree or intend to agree that a judicial resolution of the underlying dispute would result in a particular solution. Hall v. Time Ins. Co., 854 F.2d 440, 1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 12015 (11th Cir. 1988).

Parties may reach accord and satisfaction as to some, but not all, distinct contract demands. —

Accord and satisfaction may be made between contracting parties pro tanto. If contract is of such nature as to give rise to separate and distinct demands, or to create a number of separate obligations and cross-obligations, and a number of distinct breaches as to these separate obligations occur, parties may make accord and satisfaction, or what in law amounts to accord and satisfaction, as to one or more of these demands, without affecting others. State Farm Fire & Cas. Co. v. Fordham, 148 Ga. App. 48, 250 S.E.2d 843, 1978 Ga. App. LEXIS 3013 (1978).

Compromise or mutual accord and satisfaction is binding on both parties.

Collier v. Casey, 59 Ga. App. 627, 1 S.E.2d 776, 1939 Ga. App. LEXIS 377 (1939).

Completed contract of accord and satisfaction may be rescinded by agreement, or waived by acts

or conduct of party thereto, in which case debt is restored to its original status. Eldon Indus., Inc. v. Paradies & Co., 397 F. Supp. 535, 1975 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11706 (N.D. Ga. 1975).

Avoidance of accord and satisfaction on ground of fraud generally requires restitution.

Interstate Life & Accident Co. v. Shedrick, 57 Ga. App. 382, 195 S.E. 456, 1938 Ga. App. LEXIS 605 (1938).

Former Civil Code 1895, § 3711 (see O.C.G.A. §13-4-60) governed rescission of fraudulent accord and satisfaction.

Pattison v. Albany Bldg. & Loan Ass'n, 63 Ga. 373, 1879 Ga. LEXIS 225 (1879).

Breach of contract accepted in satisfaction of claim will not restore original status.

Byrd Printing Co. v. Whitaker Paper Co., 135 Ga. 865, 70 S.E. 798, 1911 Ga. LEXIS 102 (1911).

Party pleading accord and satisfaction must show express agreement or new consideration. —

Burden of proof of existence of accord and satisfaction lies with party relying on doctrine, which involves, among other things, express agreement or some new consideration. Fowler v. Gorrell, 148 Ga. App. 573, 251 S.E.2d 819, 1978 Ga. App. LEXIS 3220 (1978).

Agreement will not operate as accord and satisfaction unless so agreed.

Treisch v. Doster, 65 Ga. App. 41, 14 S.E.2d 612, 1941 Ga. App. LEXIS 249 (1941).

Execution of new agreement will itself amount to satisfaction only where expressly agreed by parties.

First Nat'l Bank v. Appalachian Indus., Inc., 146 Ga. App. 630, 247 S.E.2d 422, 1978 Ga. App. LEXIS 2488 (1978); Fowler v. Gorrell, 148 Ga. App. 573, 251 S.E.2d 819, 1978 Ga. App. LEXIS 3220 (1978).

When there is no agreement to settle all disputes under contract, satisfaction does not result

although money is demanded and received. Pierson v. Herrington, 138 Ga. App. 463, 226 S.E.2d 299, 1976 Ga. App. LEXIS 2194 (1976); First Nat'l Bank v. Appalachian Indus., Inc., 146 Ga. App. 630, 247 S.E.2d 422, 1978 Ga. App. LEXIS 2488 (1978); Fowler v. Gorrell, 148 Ga. App. 573, 251 S.E.2d 819, 1978 Ga. App. LEXIS 3220 (1978).

Agreement to reach accord and satisfaction of disputed debt may be either express or implied.

Eldon Indus., Inc. v. Paradies & Co., 397 F. Supp. 535, 1975 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11706 (N.D. Ga. 1975).

There must be meeting of minds as to subject matter embraced in accord and satisfaction.

Myers v. American Fin. Sys., 615 F.2d 368, 1980 U.S. App. LEXIS 18711 (5th Cir. 1980).

13-4-102.
Benefit to creditor.

An accord and satisfaction must be of some advantage, legal or equitable, to the creditor or it shall not have the effect of barring him from his legal rights under the original agreement.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2821; Code 1868, § 2829; Code 1873, § 2880; Code 1882, § 2880; Civil Code 1895, § 3734; Civil Code 1910, § 4328; Code 1933, § 20-1203.

Party pleading accord and satisfaction must show express agreement or new consideration. —

Burden of proof of existence of accord and satisfaction lies with party relying on doctrine which involves, among other things, express agreement or some new consideration. Fowler v. Gorrell, 148 Ga. App. 573, 251 S.E.2d 819, 1978 Ga. App. LEXIS 3220 (1978).

13-4-103.
Acceptance of less than amount of debt.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, an agreement by a creditor to receive less than the amount of his debt cannot be pleaded as an accord and satisfaction unless it is actually executed by the payment of the money, the giving of additional security, the substitution of another debtor, or some other new consideration.

Acceptance by a creditor of a check, draft, or money order marked “payment in full” or with language of equivalent condition, in an amount less than the total indebtedness, shall not constitute an accord and satisfaction unless:

A bona fide dispute or controversy exists as to the amount due; or

Such payment is made pursuant to an independent agreement between the creditor and debtor that such payment shall satisfy the debt.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2822; Code 1868, § 2830; Code 1873, § 2881; Code 1882, § 2881; Civil Code 1895, § 3735; Civil Code 1910, § 4329; Code 1933, § 20-1204; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1051, § 1.

Part of payment-in-full language on check stricken. —

Chiropractor’s negotiation of a check bearing the language “Settlement in Full” constituted an accord and satisfaction, even though the chiropractor struck out part of the payment-in-full language and wrote in a restrictive endorsement of the chiropractor’s own which said “accepted as partial payment only.” Rhone v. State Auto Mut. Ins. Co., 664 F. Supp. 1431, 1987 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6937 (S.D. Ga. 1987), aff'd, 858 F.2d 1507, 1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 14457 (11th Cir. 1988).

In an action on a note, summary judgment for the holder was error because an issue of fact remained regarding an accord and satisfaction, given affidavits that the holder agreed to forego collecting on the note in exchange for allowing the holder’s mother to live in a home formerly owned by the holder’s spouse and upon payment of a final interest payment of $1,500 in 1996, with no further requests for payment until 2010. Thomas v. Summers, 329 Ga. App. 250, 764 S.E.2d 578, 2014 Ga. App. LEXIS 661 (2014).

Part payment of lesser amount not satisfaction of entire debt, but only defense pro tanto. —

Taylor v. Central of Ga. Ry., 99 Ga. App. 224, 108 S.E.2d 103, 1959 Ga. App. LEXIS 822 (1959).

Part execution of accord may be pleaded as satisfaction pro tanto.

Brunswick & W. Ry. v. Clem, 80 Ga. 534, 7 S.E. 84, 1888 Ga. LEXIS 179 (1888).

Willingness or readiness to pay or perform is not equivalent of performance or payment,

and is therefore not satisfaction; nothing short of actual performance or payment, meaning performance or payment accepted, will suffice. Campbell Coal Co. v. Pano, 51 Ga. App. 232, 180 S.E. 139, 1935 Ga. App. LEXIS 642 (1935).

In a landlord-tenant dispute

where a tenant who could vacate the premises on 120 days’ notice gave notice of the tenant’s intent to vacate and said the tenant would vacate on a later date and then subsequently said the tenant was only liable for rent for 120 days from the date of the tenant’s notice rather than the date included with the notice, when the tenant actually vacated the premises within the 120 days, the tenant was liable for rent until the tenant’s original vacation date (the date included in the notice), and the tenant’s tender of rent until the date the tenant actually vacated was not an accord and satisfaction because the landlord did not agree to accept that amount in satisfaction of the rent due, nor was there evidence that the tenant’s check for the lesser amount or the letter accompanying that check contained any conditional language, such as “payment in full.” Logistics Int'l, Inc. v. RACO/Melaver, LLC, 257 Ga. App. 879, 572 S.E.2d 388, 2002 Ga. App. LEXIS 1327 (2002).

Trial court did not err in finding that a commercial tenant failed to prove the affirmative defense of accord and satisfaction pursuant to O.C.G.A. §13-4-103 in an action by the landlord for recovery of rent and other charges due as the tenant failed to show that there was a bona fide dispute as to the amount due prior to paying the reduced amount, and the restrictive wording on the check did not remedy the insufficiency of the proof. Rafizadeh v. KR Snellville, LLC, 280 Ga. App. 613, 634 S.E.2d 406, 2006 Ga. App. LEXIS 681 (2006).

13-4-104.
Parties bound by accord and satisfaction.

An accord and satisfaction is binding upon both parties.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2823; Code 1868, § 2831; Code 1873, § 2882; Code 1882, § 2882; Civil Code 1895, § 3736; Civil Code 1910, § 4330; Code 1933, § 20-1205.

Party cannot attack agreement on grounds of unilateral mistake. —

When final commission check to employee by employer was intended as a compromise and settlement of all claims between the parties, and when employer claimed that the employer subsequently discovered an overpayment in the amount of the check due to the employer’s own mathematical error, the employee denying any such overpayment, employer could not attack the agreement on grounds of unilateral mistake. Mobley v. Fulton Roofing Co., 173 Ga. App. 563, 327 S.E.2d 540, 1985 Ga. App. LEXIS 1618 (1985).

Mistake resulting from negligence of party to settlement contract will not render contract invalid.

D.H. Overmyer Co. v. Joe Summers Roofing Co., 120 Ga. App. 188, 169 S.E.2d 821, 1969 Ga. App. LEXIS 709 (1969).

Law of this state favors settlements and cessation of litigation.

Coleman v. Ellenberg (In re Cohen), 6 Bankr. 708, 1980 Bankr. LEXIS 4207 (Bankr. N.D. Ga. 1980).

In equity, termination of family controversies affords consideration sufficient to support contract for such purpose.

Fulford v. Fulford, 225 Ga. 9, 165 S.E.2d 848, 1969 Ga. LEXIS 355 (1969).

Law and equity not only allow but strongly encourage private settlements of family affairs.

Trammell v. West, 224 Ga. 365, 162 S.E.2d 353, 1968 Ga. LEXIS 780 (1968).

Compromise of family claims is favored both in law and equity.

Dickerson v. Dickerson, 19 Ga. App. 269, 91 S.E. 346, 1917 Ga. App. LEXIS 94 (1917).

Party relying on doctrine must show matter included. —

When settlement is pleaded as an estoppel, burden is upon party relying thereon to sustain plea by showing that particular matter was included in compromise. Glisson v. Burkhalter, 31 Ga. App. 365, 120 S.E. 664, 1923 Ga. App. LEXIS 948 (1923).